static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
горд/A1N1
визё/A1N1
вож/A1N1
чыртыё/A1N1
вылӥ-вылӥ/A1N1
куалектыл/A1N1
уждунъем/A1N1
кавычкатэм/A1N1
кылыктэм/A1N1
йыртэм/A1N1
дӥньтэм/A1N1
иодо/A1N1
гаӵко/A1N1
нунылыко/A1N1
вӧлэмо/A1N1
кокро/A1N1
почвенно-будосо/A1N1
висэто/A1N1
гынйыр/A1N1
бускылес/A1N1
шакырес/A1N1
пожалэс/A1N1
зуркыт/A1N1
изгы/A1N1
куалась/A1N1
изэсь/A1N1
палдурскемо/A1N1# С.М.
пеперес/A1N1# Маша
агитмассовой/A1N1R1
безопасной/A1N1R1
винной/A1N1R1
геолого-технической/A1N1R1
деревообрабатывающой/A1N1R1
запасной/A1N1R1
июльской/A1N1R1
кондитерской/A1N1R1
массивно-кристаллической/A1N1R1
неоформленной/A1N1R1
паровозной/A1N1R1
предложной/A1N1R1
ротационной/A1N1R1
судостроительной/A1N1R1
фирсовой/A1N1R1
ямбической/A1N1R1
россей/A2
камсьӧр/A2
камтупал/A2
волгадур/A2
можга/A2
вавож/A2
бразиль/A2
саркуз/A2
тибет/A2
беларусь/A2
грах/A2
сиам/A2
алнаш/A2
лудӟи/A2
ньылондор/A2
нылга калык/A2
австрали/A2
автономи/A2
азов/A2
холмогор/A2
англи/A2
балтач/A2
бельги/A2
вильгурт/A2
голланди/A2
дэбес/A2
иран/A2
исланди/A2
итали/A2
камчатка/A2
кукмор/A2
латин/A2
огъяэлькун/A2
перм/A2
персиян/A2
туркестан/A2
христиан/A2N1
мордва/A2
арктика/A2
волгакузяна/A2
бигра/A2
вьетнам/A2
мальпигиев/A2
евстахиева/A2
азям/B1D1
бере/B1C1
бертӥ/B1
бордозь/B1
бӧрсьы/B1
бӧрсяды/B1D1
вадьсыз/B1
вадьсысьтыды/B1
вадьсытӥзы/B1
вискын/B1
вӧзысен/B1
выламы/B1D1
дӥньтӥ/B1
дӥням/B1D1
дорам/B1D1
дурозь/B1
дыръя/B1C1
дыръяд/B1D1
ёроскозь/B1
ёросы/B1
ёрсысь/B1
калэ/B1
кожын/B1
котырысен/B1
куспамы/B1D1
куспозь/B1
ласянь/B1
паласен/B1
палтӥ/B1
пӧлысь/B1
понна/B1C1
пӧрат/B1
пумит/B1
пумысен/B1
серкысен/B1
сьӧрамы/B1
сьӧры/B1
сяназэ/B1
тӥнняд/B1D1
улсытӥ/B1
урдсысь/B1
урдсытӥз/B1D1
урдсэтӥ/B1
ӵожелы/B1D1
шорозь/B1
ӵоштэк/B1
а/C1P1
агар/C1
айкась/C1
будьто/C1P1
если/C1
ито/C1
ке/C1P1
либо/C1
не/C1
но/C1I1P1
ной/C1
нош/C1P1
однако/C1
раз/C1
сокутэк/C1
яке/C1P1
или/C1
хотя/C1
разве/C1
али/C1
аль/C1
макем/C1
маркем/C1
зато/C1
куре/D1B1
вакытаз/D1B1
азьлон/D1B1
улын/D1B1
кыкнапала/D1
сокудняла/D1
ӟиг-ӟиг/D1
огместае/D1
табере/D1
кырыж-мерыж/D1
куспаз/D1
урыз/D1
улӥетӥ/D1
лобак/D1
шыркак/D1
кырмак/D1
ларак/D1
ӵыжырак/D1
пырсак-пырсак/D1
тачак/D1
уйлатэк-маратэк/D1
мыдланяк/D1
капчигем/D1
тапалан/D1
сӥен-сӥен/D1
огсямен/D1
вамышен-вамышен/D1
вылӥын/D1
арбытскын/D1
радэн/D1
пыдло/D1
ганьыр-ганьыр/D1
наугат/D1
тырмыт/D1
кайпаллы/D1
ваннапалозь/D1
выллапалласянь/D1
кыдёкысь/D1
соберезэ/D1
кызьы-ке/D1M1
кудкеме/D1M1
сонякеме/D1M1
отӥ-татӥ/D1M1
одӥгтэм/D1M1
шӧлказы/D1M1
шыпык/D1A1N1
йӧскадь/D1A1N1
худо-бедно/D3
интеллигентно/D3
оффлайн /D3
начисто/D3
химически/D3
технически/D3
систематически/D3
фактически/D3
катастрофически/D3
по-матросски/D3
амбулаторно /D3
анонимно/D3
вертикально/D3
вредно/D3
грамотно/D3
досконально/D3
зависимо/D3
заочно/D3
исключительно/D3
категорично/D3
настойчиво/D3
литературно/D3
морально/D3
нарошно/D3
натуралистично/D3
неладно/D3
обезательно/D3O3
обязательно/D3
организованно/D3
отлично/D3
персонально/D3
подпольно/D3
последовательно/D3
промышленно/D3
разумно/D3
самостоятельно/D3
серьёзно/D3
смирно/D3
специально/D3
точно/D3
условно/D3
характерно/D3
честно/D3
сразу/D3
вӧсь/E1
ракат/E1
жаль/E1
некогда/E1
Дударов/F1
Абоимов/F1
Амеличкин/F1
Афоненков/F1
Бартенев/F1
Бенни/F1
Бойко/F1
Брэдшо/F1
Вагурин/F1
Верхокамцов/F1
Второв/F1
Гачко/F1
Головиных/F1
Гринченко/F1
Дворяцких/F1
Домодыко/F1
Егоренков/F1
Жмеренюк/F1
Зейдеман/F1
Иллеш/F1
Камышенков/F1
Кербатов/F1
Ковалевский/F1
Конохов/F1
Кофель/F1
Кубышкин/F1
Кушманов/F1
Лесунов/F1
Лумумба/F1
Малышко/F1
Миттеран/F1
Непогодин/F1
Палин/F1
Подошевкин/F1
Райханов/F1
Саларев/F1
Скочнягин/F1
Сумороков/F1
Трудолюбов/F1
Филькенштейн/F1
Ценнер/F1
Шалтыков/F1
Штумпф/F1
Давиташвили/F1
Лукъян/F2
Дюйшен/F2
Венюш/F2
Нюша/F2
Токош/F2
Акпай/F2
Арсания/F2
Бектэмыр/F2
Валюша/F2
Вассапай/F2
Гавирло/F2
Горей/F2
Дунька/F2
Закарья/F2
Зуфар/F2
Исьтёп/F2
Катюш/F2
Конор/F2
Лавыр/F2
Лелюк/F2
Ляват/F2
Мартемьян/F2
Мика/F2
Мукай/F2
Нинок/F2
Оксиння/F2
Омель/F2
Опонасей/F2
Офимья/F2
Паня/F2
Педоча/F2
Полюшка/F2
Сабит/F2
Сергуш/F2
Сьпира/F2
Тӥрок/F2
Ульян/F2
Чачабей/F2
Яшка/F2
Эте/F2
Митырка/F2
Олексей/F2
Гарим/F2
Трындычиха/F3
Юхан/F3
Фока/F3
Ааро/F3
Аднер/F3
Александрина/F3
Аляр/F3
Анна-Мария/F3
Армине/F3
Ахлиман/F3
Блейк/F3
Ванадий/F3
Виганторп/F3
Власта/F3
Гасан/F3
Гонсало/F3
Дан/F3
Джана/F3
Доменик/F3
Елу/F3
Зарифа/F3
Изосим/F3
Ионас/F3
Каарина/F3
Качырий/F3
Костик/F3
Лали/F3
Лёва/F3
Люба/F3
Мансур/F3
Матвей/F3
Мила/F3
Настаси/F3
Ондроп/F3
Прокови/F3
Робин/F3
Сарра/F3
Стапан/F3
Трейси/F3
Фома/F3
Шамо/F3
Энди/F3
Олжас/F3
Рифатович/F5
Джамбулатович/F5
Пильыпыч/F5
Авенирович/F5
Акбердинович/F5
Альфатович/F5
Анриевич/F5
Арменакович/F5
Атамович/F5
Бенович/F5
Варданович/F5
Викулович/F5
Вольмирович/F5
Гарикович/F5
Германович/F5
Данаилович/F5
Диянович/F5
Екубжонович/F5
Замирович/F5
Измаилович/F5
Инсафович/F5
Исмагиловна/F5
Кенжебаевич/F5
Корюнович/F5
Ленарович/F5
Маилович/F5
Матусович/F5
Митрофанович/F5
Мяртович/F5
Никитович/F5
Омарович/F5
Педотович/F5
Рагимович/F5
Рафаэлевич/F5
Робертович/F5
Савватеевич/F5
Сахипзадович/F5
Соломонович/F5
Таронович/F5
Фадеевич/F5
Фролович/F5
Эмилевич/F5
Саитович/F5
Котофей/F6
Дианка/F6
Шерхан/F6
Свингер/F6
Жучка/F6
Барбос/F6
Сьӧдань/F6
Полкан/F6
Серко/F6
Голубка/F6
Чернышка/F6
Олейна/J1N1
Авиахим/J1N1
Азов-Сити/J1N1
Алёнушка/J1N1
баунти/J1N1
БНКоми/J1N1
Внешэкономбанк/J1N1
Газпром/J1N1
Горкоммунсеть/J1N1
Гражданпроект/J1N1
Дмитлаг/J1N1
завком/J1N1
ИжАвто/J1N1
Иллюзион/J1N1
казанка/J1N1
Комивидеопрокат/J1N1
Комисельбанк/J1N1
Крафиласт/J1N1
Лидеринвестгрупп/J1N1
Малышок/J1N1
минкультура/J1N1
Мосэнерго/J1N1
Нокиа/J1N1
Ортвузком/J1N1
Плана/J1N1
Пузлаторг/J1N1
Рено/J1N1
росимущество/J1N1
Ростехнология/J1N3
Светофорик/J1N1
Сибирьтелеком/J1N1
Сосногорье/J1N1
Стройматериалы-к/J1N1
Телемахида/J1N1
ТрансКлассСервис/J1N1
Удмуртгеология/J1N3
уисполком/J1N1
Ухтижемлаг/J1N1
фуфанон/J1N1
шевроле/J1N1
Энергосбыт/J1N1
Яндекс/J1N1
СПИД-инфо/J1N1
чур/I1
эге-гей/I1
ёшки-палки/I1
ха-ха/I1
хо-хо/I1
ай/I1
ак/I1
ам/I1
ать/I1
ач-ач/I1
бис/I1
бӧбӧ/I1
вӧсе/I1
гулю-гулю/I1
дыр-р-р/I1
золой/I1
кай/I1N2
кысӥе/I1
кыштыресь-а/I1
ма-ма-ма/I1
неужто/I1
но-о/I1
ӧбӧб/I1
однако-однако/I1C1
ойдо/I1
ой-ой-ой/I1
олӥ/I1
оллӥ/I1
о-о/I1
ӧрсь-ӧрсь/I1
ӧч/I1
пись/I1
прис/I1
тпрузь/I1
уй-и-и/I1
ха-ха-ха/I1
чук-чук/I1
ыш-ыш/I1
эккой/I1
эх/I1
алло/I1
едрёно-шиш/I1
ёк-моколёк/I1
эть-эть/I1
вить/L1N1
витьдас/L1O3
витьтон/L1
дас/L1N1
даспуй/L1O3
киямыс/L1O3
киямыстас/L1O3
куамын/L1
куать/L1N1
куатьдас/L1O3
куатьтон/L1
куинь/L1N1
кызь/L1
кык/L1N1
кыкъямыс/L1N1
кыкъямыстон/L1
ньыль/L1
ньыльдас/L1O3
ньыльдон/L1
сизьым/L1N1
сизьымдас/L1O3
сизьымдон/L1
сю/L1N1
сюрс/L1N1
тямыс/L1N1
тямыстон/L1
укмыс/L1N1
укмысдас/L1O3
укмыстон/L1
одӥг/L1N1
уик/L1N1O3
ог/L1N1
миллён/L1N1O3
миллиард/L1N1
миллион/L1N1
триллион/L1N1
ноль/L1N1
нуль/L1N1
восьмой/L3A1N1
первой/L3A1N1
кыктэн/L3D1
нырысетӥ/L3A1N1
нырысь/L3A1N1D1
девяносто/L3
девять/L3
кыкмы/L3
кыксы/L3
кыксэс/L3
огнад/L5
огназ/L5
огнам/L5
огнамы/L5
огнады/L5
огназы/L5
монэ/M1
монлань/M1
милям/M1
милямъёс/M1
тонэн/M1
тӥляд/M1
тӥлань/M1
аслад/M1A1N1
ачимтэк/M1
асьтэдыз/M1
асьсэтэк/M1
асьмелань/M1
асьмелэнзэ/M1
ачизлы/M1# ?
асьтэдыс/M1
огмылэсь/M1
огдылань/M1
одӥгнад/M1L3D1
одӥгназ/M1L3D1
одӥгнам/M1L3
ваньмес/M1
ваньдытэк/M1
ваньмызъя/M1
кинлэнзэ/M1# кин
кӧня/M1L1
котькӧня/M1L1
котькудлань/M1D1
котькытынлэсь/M1D1
кудӥз-мукетыз/M1
кудпалан/M1D1
кудъёс/M1C1
кытӥез/M1D1
кытӥысен/M1D1
кыӵе/A1N1M1
маре/M1
нема/M1
ненокӧня/M1L1
ниномыр/M1
нокӧня/M1L1
нокытӥтӥз/M1D1
окмар/M1U3
олокӧня/M1L1
олокудкемысен/M1D1
олокытӥ-мар/M1D1
оломакемысь/M1D1
самой/M1
соньын/M1D1
тамында/M1
вичакой/M1
ӟыгыри/N1D1
коркад/K1
корказ/K1
коркам/K1
коркан/K1
коркасен/K1
коркасеныд/K1
коркасеныды/K1
коркасеныз/K1
коркасенызы/K1
коркасеным/K1
коркасенымы/K1
коркась/K1
коркасьтыд/K1
коркасьтыды/K1
коркасьтыз/K1
коркасьтызы/K1
коркасьтым/K1
коркасьтымы/K1
куалан/K1
куаласен/K1
куаласеныд/K1
куаласеныды/K1
куаласеныз/K1
куаласенызы/K1
куаласеным/K1
куаласенымы/K1
куаласьтыд/K1
куаласьтыды/K1
куаласьтыз/K1
куаласьтызы/K1
куаласьтым/K1
куаласьтымы/K1
гинэ/P1C1
да/P1C1
оло/P1C1
только/P1C1
уго/P1C1
эсьма/P1C1
эсьмаса/P1C1
я/P1I1C1
